Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 188, O.S.L.
2024 (17 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 180.13), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 180.13. A. While the Oklahoma Corporation Commission
is subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, Corporation
Commissioners are exempt from and may discuss administrative,
operational, and procedural matters of the Corporation Commission
between or among Commissioners, even if a quorum is present,
provided the discussions do not address appropriation of Corporation
Commission funds and no official action is taken. Corporation
Commissioners may not discuss pending legislative matters before the
Corporation Commission without complying with the Oklahoma Open
Req. No. 14100 Page 1

Meet ing Act. The administrative, operational, and procedural
matters authorized under this subsection are limited to the
following:
1. Scheduling of agenda items to be set before the Corporation
Commission for an emergency, regular, or special meeting;
2. Prioritizing cases pending before the Corporation
Commission;
3. Identifying legislative changes, proposed or passed, and
their effects on the Corporation Commission;
4. Discussing public and media statements;
5. Discussing organizational structure;
6. Discussing internal processes;
7. Discussing staffing needs;
8. Receiving informational updates from Corporation Commission
staff on the business of the Corporation Commission, as long as such
updates do not pertain to pending legislative proceedings of the
Corporation Commission;
9. Conducting regular staff meetings where discussions of the
day-to-day management of the Corporation Commission occur, as long
as such updates do not pertain to pending legislative proceedings of
the Corporation Commission;
10. Interviewing potential employees for the position of
Director of Administration and Division Directors; and

Req. No. 14100 Page 2

11. Assessing performance reviews and duties of the Director of
Administration and Division Directors.
B. Corporation Commissioners may attend and participate in
conferences, training, educational, press, and social events, where
the topic of these events is the Corporation Commission, even if a
quorum is present, provided that no official action is taken and any
discussion of the business of the Corporation Commission is
incidental to the event.
C. Corporation Commissioners may not discuss any pending
legislative proceedings of the Corporation Commission without
complying with the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.
D. Corporation Commissioners may attend and participate in
meetings and proceedings of the Legislature, even if a quorum is
present, provided that no official action is taken.
E. As used in this subsection, the term "event" means any
matters authorized in subsections A through D of this section.
After participating in any events authorized by this section, the
Corporation Commission shall be required to provide timely
documentation, in the form and manner as determined by a public vote
of the Corporation Commission, which may be amended subject to the
requirements of this section. This documentation is for the purpose
of providing public notice of the subject matter received by or
discussed between or among Commissioners, even if a quorum is
present, outside of a public meeting. Such documentation shall be
Req. No. 14100 Page 3

post ed to the Corporation Commission's website within five (5)
business days following the event. However, should the Corporation
Commission wish to take potential action on the subject of a
disclosed event, such potential action item shall be documented at
least forty-eight (48) hours prior to the Corporation Commission
considering such item at a public meeting.
F. Should the Corporation Commission make any changes to the
date, time, or place, including cancellation of any regularly
scheduled meeting, the Corporation Commission shall provide notice
in writing to the Secretary of State as required by paragraph 8 of
subsection A of Section 311 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
provided that the Corporation Commission may file the required
notice not less than five (5) days prior to the implementation of
any such change or cancellation.
G. The Corporation Commission shall implement periodic training
on the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act for Commissioners and designated
staff.
H. The provisions of this section shall cease to have the force
and effect of law on July 1, 2026 2031.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.




Req. No. 14100 Page 4

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14100 SW 12/07/25


















Req. No. 14100 Page 5